Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16A.83] MAXIS IMPROVEMENTS LEASE-PURCHASE FINANCING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Lease-purchase agreement" means an agreement for the lease and installment purchase of the MAXIS project, or a portion of the project, between the commissioner, on behalf of the state, and a vendor or a third-party financing source. new text end new text begin (c) "MAXIS lease-purchase guidelines" means policies, procedures, and requirements established by the commissioner for the MAXIS project that is financed pursuant to a lease-purchase agreement. new text end new text begin (d) "MAXIS project" means the development, acquisition, installation, and implementation of a modernization plan or replacement of the state's MAXIS system. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Lease-purchase financing. new text end new text begin The commissioner may enter into a lease-purchase agreement in an amount sufficient to fund the MAXIS project and authorize the public or private sale and issuance of certificates of participation, provided that: new text end new text begin (1) the MAXIS project has been authorized by law to be funded pursuant to a lease-purchase agreement; new text end new text begin (2) the term of the lease-purchase agreement and the related certificates of participation shall not exceed the lesser of (i) the expected useful life of the MAXIS project financed by the lease-purchase agreement and the certificates or (ii) ten years from the date of issuance of the lease-purchase agreement and the certificates; new text end new text begin (3) the principal amount of the lease-purchase agreement and the certificates is sufficient to provide for the costs of issuance, capitalized interest, credit enhancement, or reserves, if any, as required under the lease-purchase agreement; new text end new text begin (4) money sufficient for payment of lease obligations has been committed in the authorizing legislation for the MAXIS project for the fiscal year during which the lease-purchase agreement is entered into, provided that no lease-purchase agreement shall obligate the state to appropriate money sufficient to make lease payments due under an agreement in a future fiscal year; and new text end new text begin (5) planned expenditures for the MAXIS project are permitted within the MAXIS lease-purchase guidelines. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Covenants. new text end new text begin The commissioner may covenant in a lease-purchase agreement that the state will abide by the terms and provisions that are customary in lease-purchase financing transactions, including but not limited to covenants providing that the state: new text end new text begin (1) must maintain insurance as required under the terms of the lease-purchase agreement; new text end new text begin (2) is responsible to the lessor for any public liability or property damage claims or costs related to the selection, use, or maintenance of the MAXIS project; to the extent of insurance or self-insurance maintained by the state; and for costs and expenses incurred by the lessor as a result of any default by the state; or new text end new text begin (3) authorizes the lessor to exercise the rights of a secured party with respect to the MAXIS project or any portion of the project in the event of default or nonappropriation of money by the state, and for the present recovery of lease payments due during the current term of the lease-purchase agreement as liquidated damages in the event of default. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Credit and appropriation of proceeds. new text end new text begin Proceeds of the lease-purchase agreement and certificates of participation must be credited to the MAXIS lease project fund in the state treasury. Net income from investment of the proceeds, as estimated by the commissioner, must be credited to the appropriate accounts in the MAXIS lease project fund. Money in the MAXIS lease project fund is appropriated for the purposes described in the authorizing law for the MAXIS project under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Transfer of funds. new text end new text begin Before the lease-purchase proceeds are received in the MAXIS lease project fund, the commissioner may transfer to that fund from the general fund amounts not exceeding the expected proceeds from the lease-purchase agreement and certificates of participation. The commissioner shall return these amounts to the general fund by transferring proceeds when received. The amounts of these transfers are appropriated from the general fund and from the MAXIS lease project fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administrative expenses. new text end new text begin Actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses of employees and all other nonsalary expenses incidental to the sale, printing, execution, and delivery of the lease-purchase agreement and certificates of participation may be paid from the lease-purchase proceeds. The lease-purchase proceeds are appropriated for this purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Treatment of MAXIS lease project fund. new text end new text begin Lease-purchase proceeds remaining in the MAXIS lease project fund after the purpose for which the lease-purchase agreement was undertaken is accomplished or abandoned, as determined by the commissioner, must be transferred to the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Lease-purchase not public debt. new text end new text begin A lease-purchase agreement does not constitute or create a general or moral obligation or indebtedness of the state in excess of the money from time to time appropriated or otherwise available for payments or obligations under the agreement. Payments due under a lease-purchase agreement during a current lease term for which money has been appropriated is a current expense of the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Tax treatment. new text end new text begin Property purchased subject to a lease-purchase agreement under this section is not subject to personal property taxes. The purchaser of property for lease to the state under a valid lease-purchase agreement under this section is not subject to the sales tax on the purchase of the property or on the payments received under the agreement, but the state is subject to the tax under chapter 297A on property acquired under the agreement. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Refunding certificates. new text end new text begin The commissioner from time to time may enter into a new lease-purchase agreement and issue and sell certificates of participation for the purpose of refunding any lease-purchase agreement and related certificates of participation then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premiums, any interest accrued or that is to accrue to the redemption date, and costs related to the issuance and sale of the refunding certificates. The proceeds of any refunding certificates may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be applied (1) to the purchase or payment at maturity of the certificates to be refunded, (2) to the redemption of outstanding lease-purchase agreements and certificates on any redemption date, or (3) to pay interest on the refunding lease-purchase agreements and certificates and may, pending application, be placed in escrow to be applied to the purchase, payment, retirement, or redemption. Any escrowed proceeds, pending use, may be invested and reinvested in obligations that are authorized investments under section 11A.24. The income earned or realized on any authorized investment may also be applied to the payment of the lease-purchase agreements and certificates to be refunded, interest or premiums on the refunded certificates, or to pay interest on the refunding lease-purchase agreements and certificates. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied, any balance of proceeds and any investment income may be returned to the general fund or, if applicable, the MAXIS lease project fund, for use in a lawful manner. All refunding lease-purchase agreements and certificates issued under the provisions of this subdivision must be prepared, executed, delivered, and secured by appropriations in the same manner as the lease-purchase agreements and certificates to be refunded. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [16A.835] MAXIS LEASE-PURCHASE APPROPRIATION. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027, $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2028, and $10,000,000 in each fiscal year 2029 to 2036 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner to make payments under a lease-purchase agreement as defined in section 16A.83 for development, acquisition, installation, and implementation of a modernization plan or replacement of the state's MAXIS system, provided that the state is not obligated to continue the appropriation of money or to make lease payments in any future fiscal year. Any unexpended portions of this appropriation cancel to the general fund at the close of each biennium. This section expires June 30, 2037. new text end